Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-9309
Travel insurance; classified as inland marine line of insurance; form; standards.

(1) Travel insurance shall be classified and filed for purposes of rates and forms under an inland marine line of insurance, however, travel insurance that provides coverage for sickness, accident, disability, or death occurring during travel, either exclusively, or in conjunction with related coverages of emergency evacuation, repatriation of remains, or incidental limited property and casualty benefits such as baggage or trip cancellation, may be filed under either an accident and health line of insurance or an inland marine line of insurance.

(2) Travel insurance may be in the form of an individual, group, or blanket policy.

(3) Eligibility and underwriting standards for travel insurance may be developed and provided based on travel protection plans designed for individual or identified marketing or distribution channels, so long as those standards also meet this state's underwriting standards for inland marine lines of insurance.

Laws 2022, LB863, § 9.